Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-1110
Act, how cited.

Sections 79-1110 to 79-1167 shall be known and may be cited as the Special Education Act.

Laws 1987, LB 367, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 487, § 14;

Laws 1993, LB 520, § 22;

Laws 1995, LB 742, § 4;

R.S.Supp.,1995, § 79-3301;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 792;

Laws 1997, LB 346, § 9;

Laws 1997, LB 865, § 3;

Laws 1998, Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 46;

Laws 1999, LB 813, § 36;

Laws 2000, LB 1135, § 23;

Laws 2009, LB549, § 39;

Laws 2010, LB1087, § 2;

Laws 2019, LB675, § 12.